Tennessee, session 114, HB2172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-1-206(a), is amended by deleting
the language "February 15" and substituting "February 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2172
012201
- 1 -